Louisiana, session 2026, SB385.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Section 1 of Act No. 130 of the 1896 Regular Session of the Legislature,
as amended by Act No. 395 of the 2006 Regular Session of the Legislature, Act No. 257 of
the 2020 Regular Session of the Legislature, and Act No. 613 of the 2024 Regular Session
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 385 ENROLLED
of the Legislature is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 1. Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Louisiana,
That:
(A) The park in the City of New Orleans known as the "New Orleans City
Park" be and is hereby placed under control and management of the "New Orleans
City Park Improvement Association" incorporated under the laws of the State, by an
act before Felix J. Dreyfous, Notary Public, on the 13th day of August, 1891.
(B) The secretary of the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism shall
be a member of the board of commissioners of the New Orleans City Park
Improvement Association. The secretary may designate a person to serve as a
member of the board of commissioners in his absence.
(C) The president of the Senate, or his designee, shall be a member of the
board of commissioners of the New Orleans City Park Improvement Association for
a term concurrent with his elected term.
(D) The speaker of the House of Representatives, or his designee, shall be a
member of the board of commissioners of the New Orleans City Park Improvement
Association for a term concurrent with his elected term.
(E) The senator, or his designee, for the district in which New Orleans City
Park lies shall be a member of the board of commissioners of the New Orleans City
Park Improvement Association for a term concurrent with his elected term.
(F) The member of the House of Representatives, or his designee, for the
district in which New Orleans City Park lies shall be a member of the board of
commissioners of the New Orleans City Park Improvement Association for a term
concurrent with his elected term.
(G) Members of the board of commissioners of the New Orleans City Park
Improvement Association pursuant to Subsections (C), (D), (E), and (F) of this
Section shall also serve as members of the governing authority of any nonprofit or
not-for-profit firm, corporation, or entity that the New Orleans City Park
Improvement Association contracts with for the operation, care, control, and
management of the park and its facilities.
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 385 ENROLLED
Section 2. Sections 1 through 8 of Act No. 569 of the 1989 Regular Session of the
Legislature, as amended by Act No. 13 of the 1998 First Extraordinary Session of the
Legislature, Act No. 395 of the 2006 Regular Session of the Legislature, and Act No. 613
of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature, is amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 1. A.(1) The New Orleans City Park Improvement Association,
through its board of commissioners, is hereby vested with authority to and may
contract with any nonprofit or not-for-profit firm, corporation, or entity, as more
specifically provided in Section 2 of this Act, for the operation, care, control, and
management of the park and its facilities or to contract with any such entity for any
of such purposes for any or all of such facilities.
(2) The authority granted by this Section shall include but shall not be limited
to the authority to contract for:
(a) The recruiting, hiring, and employing by the contractor of such kinds and
numbers of non-managerial employees to be managed, supervised, directed, and/or
scheduled by the board or its designee as the board or its designee may direct from
time to time.
(b) The procurement by the contractor for the park or the board of such goods
and/or services as the board or its designee may direct from time to time.
(3)(a) Any firm, corporation, or entity with which the board contracts as
authorized by this Section shall be deemed to be a private entity and shall not be
deemed to be an agent or agency of the state for purposes of provisions of law
relative to procurement of goods and services, leases of facilities, or subcontracts to
manage facilities or services, including but not limited to the Louisiana Procurement
Code (R.S. 39:1551 et seq.); Chapter 17 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, relative to procurement of professional, personal, consulting, and social
services; Chapter 10 of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, relative
to public contracts; and Chapter 10 of Title 41 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, relative to leases of public lands. Any such firm, corporation, or entity with
which the board so contracts may be named as an additional insured on all general
liability, property, automobile, employment practices liability, and workers'
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 385 ENROLLED
compensation insurance plans that insure the New Orleans City Park Improvement
Association, including participation in the state risk management program.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section or of any other law to the
contrary, no contract to manage services or facilities related to golf or tennis shall be
entered into by the board or by any entity contracting with the board unless the
contractor with whom the board or such entity contracts has been selected pursuant
to a request for proposals designed to promote competition, and the proposals have
been evaluated by a multimember selection committee.
B. The board is prohibited from entering into any contract under the
provisions of this Act which is for a purpose not in conformity with the master plan
for New Orleans City Park required by the provisions of Act No. 865 of the 1982
Regular Session of the Legislature or which is otherwise not in conformity with such
master plan.
C. Any agreement that the board may enter into in accordance with this Act
may be a contract, lease, or combination contract and lease.
D. The board shall in its sole discretion determine the terms, conditions, and
duration of any contract or lease entered into under the provisions of this Act. Any
contract or lease entered into by the board under the provisions of this Act shall
contain a provision in such contract or lease that the contract or lease may be
terminated by the board, with or without just cause, upon written notification to all
parties in the contract or lease, which notification shall be given not less than ninety
days prior to the termination.
Section 2. Only a firm, corporation, or entity that is organized under the laws
of the state of Louisiana shall be eligible to contract with the board under the
provisions of this Act, and only a firm, corporation, or entity that is organized as a
nonprofit or not-for-profit firm, corporation, or entity and which has as its primary
purpose the betterment and improvement of New Orleans City Park and has at least
five hundred members shall be eligible to contract with the board under the
provisions of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall be construed to grant the board the authority to
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 385 ENROLLED
contract in a cooperative endeavor for the operation, care, control, and management
of the park and its facilities, including any or all facilities located in the park on the
effective date of this Act and any future facilities located in the park. This authority
shall extend to all lands and property for which management and control has been
vested in the New Orleans City Park Improvement Association.
Section 4. The board shall have the right to assign any existing contracts that
it may have on the effective date of this Act to any contracting party under the
provisions of this Act. Contracts regarding Tad Gormley Stadium, the Pan-American
Stadium, or any other stadium constructed in the future, if assigned, shall be assigned
under the same terms and conditions existing on June 1, 1989.
Section 5. The board shall have full authority to delegate to the nonprofit
entity its ability or authority to collect any rents, charges, admissions, or fares it may
be empowered to collect.
Section 6. Any contractor shall have the full authority to hire its own
employees to provide services under a contract authorized by this Act, including but
not limited to any services formerly provided by the employees of the New Orleans
City Park Improvement Association or its board.
Section 7. Any contract entered into under the provisions of this Act shall be
deemed to be a cooperative endeavor under the provisions of Article VII, Section
14(C) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 8. Nothing in this Act No. 569 of the 1989 Regular Session of the
Legislature, as amended by Act No. 13 of the 1998 First Extraordinary Session of the
Legislature and Section 2 of the Act which originated as House Bill No. 744 of the
2006 Regular Session of the Legislature, shall be construed to affect or diminish, in
any manner whatsoever, the rights, powers, and authority otherwise granted by law
to the New Orleans City Park Improvement Association and its board of
commissioners to manage and control New Orleans City Park, and the authority
granted to the New Orleans City Park Improvement Association and its board by this
Act shall be in addition to any rights, powers, and authority otherwise granted to the
association or the board by law. The provisions of this Act shall be subject to the
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 385 ENROLLED
provisions of R.S. 36:209 relative to the transfer of the New Orleans City Park
Improvement Association and its board of commissioners to the Department of
Culture, Recreation and Tourism.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.